Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2211
Violations; penalty.

Any employer who violates section 48-2209 or 48-2210 or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1995, LB 20, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 48-2205;

Laws 2003, LB 418, § 5.